Rhode Island, session 2025, SB463.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 27-18.8 of the General Laws entitled "Health Care Accessibility and
Quality Assurance Act" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-18.8-11. Contracts with providers for mental health and substance use disorder
services.
(a) Before January 1, 2026, and whenever necessitated by changes thereafter, but no less
frequently than annually, each healthcare entity or network plan shall compile and report to the
office of the health insurance commissioner a summary of how the healthcare entity or network
plan requires its contracted providers to submit claims for in-network outpatient behavioral health
services, including through the use of particular current procedural terminology (CPT) codes
specific to behavioral health services, through the use of modifiers particular to behavioral health
services appended to CPT codes of general usage, or through other formal requirements which
identify a particular claim as pertaining to in-network outpatient behavioral health services.
(b) A healthcare entity or network plan shall include in every contract with a provider for
in-network outpatient behavioral health (including substance use disorder) services, or for
outpatient diagnostic or therapeutic services with a behavioral health (including substance use
disorder) modifier, a provision that, as of January 1, 2026, rates paid under such contract for those
services shall be subject to a one-time average increase of no less than the United States Department
of Labor All Urban Consumer All Items Less Food and Energy CPI (“CPI-Urban”) percentage

increase determined by the health insurance commissioner by October 1, 2025, based on the most
recently published United States Department of Labor data as of that date plus five percent (5%).
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001807
========
LC001807 - Page 2 of 3